Arkansas, session 2025, HB1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-107(e), concerning filing of the
original draft of an initiative petition or referendum petition before
circulation, is amended to read as follows:
(e) If, as a result of his or her review of the ballot title and
popular name of a proposed initiated act or a proposed amendment to the
Arkansas Constitution, the Attorney General determines that the ballot title
or the nature of the issue, is presented in such manner that the ballot title
would be misleading or designed in such manner that a vote “FOR” the issue
would be a vote against the matter or viewpoint that the voter believes
*SSS056*
02-06-2025 09:14:55 SSS056

As Engrossed: H2/6/25 HB1222
himself or herself casting a vote for, or, conversely, that a vote “AGAINST”
the issue would be a vote for a viewpoint that the voter is against, or that
the text of the proposal conflicts with the United States Constitution or a
federal statute, the Attorney General may reject the entire ballot title,
popular name, and petition and state his or her reasons therefor and instruct
the petitioners to redesign the proposed measure and the ballot title and
popular name in a manner that would not be misleading or in conflict with the
United States Constitution or a federal statute.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-107, concerning filing of the original
draft of an initiative petition or referendum petition before circulation, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g)(1) A sponsor shall not submit multiple initiative petitions or
referendum petitions that are conflicting measures to the Attorney General
for review, except as follows:
(A) If an initiative petition or referendum petition is
certified under this section, a sponsor may submit an initiative petition or
referendum petition that is a conflicting measure with the certified
initiative petition or certified referendum petition after the date of the
next general election following the certification; or
(B) If an initiative petition or referendum petition is
rejected under this section, a sponsor may submit an initiative petition or
referendum petition that is a conflicting measure with the rejected
initiative petition or referendum petition.
(2) The Attorney General shall reject all initiative petitions
and referendum petitions that are submitted by a sponsor in violation of this
subsection.
(3) As used in this subsection, “conflicting measures” means two
(2) or more initiative petitions or referendum petitions that:
(A) Cover the same subject matter;
(B) Are for the same general purpose; and
(C) Contain different language in any part of their full
texts, ballot titles, or popular names.

SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are declared to
be severable, and the invalidity of any provision of this act shall not
02-06-2025 09:14:55 SSS056

As Engrossed: H2/6/25 HB1222
affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect without the
invalid provision.

/s/Ray
































02-06-2025 09:14:55 SSS056